Hawaii statutes.
§121-26 Relief from civil or criminal
liability. Members of the army or air national guard or the militia
ordered into active service of the State by any proper authority shall not be
liable, civilly or criminally, for any act or acts done by them in pursuance of
duty in such service. The attorney general, the attorney general's deputy,
special deputy, or appointee shall defend all actions brought civilly or
criminally for acts or omissions against any member of the army, air national
guard, or militia which reasonably appear to have occurred during the
performance of service under this chapter, or chapter 122, or during a call-up
under section 121-30, and reasonably done within the line or performance of
duty. No action or proceedings shall be prosecuted or maintained against a
member of a military court or an officer or person acting under its authority
or reviewing its proceedings, on account of the approval or imposition or
collection of a fine or penalty, or the execution of any writ, warrant, execution,
process, or mandate of a military court. [L 1967, c 196, pt of §1; HRS §121-26;
am L 1976, c 21, §1; gen ch 1985]

Note

Chapter 122 referred
to in text is repealed. For similar provisions, see Hawaii state defense
force, chapter 122A.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next